Illinois, session 104th, SB792.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Furniture Fire Safety Act is amended by 5changing Section 1001 as follows: 6    (425 ILCS 45/1001)  (from Ch. 127 1/2, par. 951-1)7    Sec. 1001. This Act may be cited as the the Furniture Fire 8Safety Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-631.)